Tennessee, session 114, HB0172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-110(b), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(b) When such person resigns or is discharged from one (1) of the services
mentioned in subsection (a) and engages in the practice of a healing art or any branch
thereof in this state, such person shall register with the appropriate board licensing that
profession.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0172
001113
- 1 -